Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.095

Gambling commission—Proceedings against, jurisdiction—Immunity from liability.

No court of the state of Washington other than the superior court of Thurston county shall have jurisdiction over any action or proceeding against the commission or any member thereof for anything done or omitted to be done in or arising out of the performance of his or her duties under this title: PROVIDED, That an appeal from an adjudicative proceeding involving a final decision of the commission to deny, suspend, or revoke a license shall be governed by chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act.

Neither the commission nor any member or members thereof shall be personally liable in any action at law for damages sustained by any person because of any acts performed or done, or omitted to be done, by the commission or any member of the commission, or any employee of the commission, in the performance of his or her duties and in the administration of this title.

[ 1989 c 175 s 41; 1981 c 139 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.

Severability—1981 c 139: See note following RCW 9.46.070.